Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1401
Navigable streams; cutoff, chute, backwater, or bayou connected with; access by boat.

To further implement the provisions of Article XV, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska, the Legislature herewith provides that the people of the state shall have access by boat to any cutoff, chute, backwater, or bayou connected with any navigable stream located in the State of Nebraska, but that nothing in this section shall serve to allow trespass upon the lands of any person.

Laws 1974, LB 565, § 1;

R.R.S.1943, § 28-589.03, (1975).